test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaandig, nmiskweyaabiimnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanba, gmiskweyaabiimnaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaandig, gmiskweyaabiimnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaaba, gmiskweyaabiimwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaadig, gmiskweyaabiimwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaaba, miskweyaabiimwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaadig, miskweyaabiimwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwiba, miskweyaabiimniwba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwidig, miskweyaabiimniwdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanin, nmiskweyaabiimnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaaning, nmiskweyaabiimnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanin, nmiskweyaabiimnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanin, gmiskweyaabiimnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaaning, gmiskweyaabiimnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanin, gmiskweyaabiimnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaan, gmiskweyaabiimwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaang, gmiskweyaabiimwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaan, gmiskweyaabiimwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaan, miskweyaabiimwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaang, miskweyaabiimwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaan, miskweyaabiimwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwan, miskweyaabiimniwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiiniing, miskweyaabiimniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwan, miskweyaabiimniwan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiibniin, nmiskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiibniing, nmiskweyaabiimbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiibniin, nmiskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiibniin, gmiskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiibniing, gmiskweyaabiimbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiibniin, gmiskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiibniin, miskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiibniing, miskweyaabiimbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiibniin, miskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiibniin, miskweyaabiimbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiibniing, miskweyaabiimbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiibniin, miskweyaabiimbaniin]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiinyshiba
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinyshidig
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg: mskweyaabiinsshiba
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv: mskweyaabiinyshan
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mskweyaabiinyshing
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mskweyaabiinyshan
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv: mskweyaabiinsshan
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mskweyaabiinsshing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mskweyaabiinsshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiinybaniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinybaniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinybaniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiinsbaniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinsbaniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinsbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiishbaniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiishbaniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiishbaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaa, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaa, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaa, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaa, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaa, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaa, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaa, miskweyaabiinymishwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshini, miskweyaabiinymishni]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaa, miskweyaabiinsmishwaa]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshini, miskweyaabiinsmishni]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshiba, nmiskweyaabiinymishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshidig, nmiskweyaabiinymishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshiba, nmiskweyaabiinsmishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshidig, nmiskweyaabiinsmishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiba, gmiskweyaabiinymishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshidig, gmiskweyaabiinymishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiba, gmiskweyaabiinsmishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshidig, gmiskweyaabiinsmishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshiba, miskweyaabiinymishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshidig, miskweyaabiinymishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshiba, miskweyaabiinsmishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshidig, miskweyaabiinsmishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshiba, miskweyaabiinymishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshidig, miskweyaabiinymishdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshiba, miskweyaabiinsmishba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshidig, miskweyaabiinsmishdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshan, nmiskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshing, nmiskweyaabiinymishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinyshan, nmiskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshan, nmiskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshing, nmiskweyaabiinsmishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsshan, nmiskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshan, gmiskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshing, gmiskweyaabiinymishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinyshan, gmiskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshan, gmiskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshing, gmiskweyaabiinsmishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsshan, gmiskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshan, miskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshing, miskweyaabiinymishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinyshan, miskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshan, miskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshing, miskweyaabiinsmishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsshan, miskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshan, miskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshing, miskweyaabiinymishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinyshan, miskweyaabiinymishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshan, miskweyaabiinsmishan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshing, miskweyaabiinsmishing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsshan, miskweyaabiinsmishan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanba, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaandig, nmiskweyaabiinyminaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanba, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaandig, nmiskweyaabiinsminaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanba, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaandig, gmiskweyaabiinyminaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaaba, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaadig, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanba, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaandig, gmiskweyaabiinsminaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaaba, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaadig, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaaba, miskweyaabiinymiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaadig, miskweyaabiinymiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwba, miskweyaabiinyminwiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwdig, miskweyaabiinyminwidig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaaba, miskweyaabiinsmiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaadig, miskweyaabiinsmiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwba, miskweyaabiinsminwiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwdig, miskweyaabiinsminwidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanin, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaaning, nmiskweyaabiinyminaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinynaanin, nmiskweyaabiinyminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanin, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaaning, nmiskweyaabiinsminaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsnaanin, nmiskweyaabiinsminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanin, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaaning, gmiskweyaabiinyminaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinynaanin, gmiskweyaabiinyminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaan, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaang, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinywaan, gmiskweyaabiinymiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanin, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaaning, gmiskweyaabiinsminaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsnaanin, gmiskweyaabiinsminaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaan, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaang, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinswaan, gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaan, miskweyaabiinymiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaang, miskweyaabiinymiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinywaan, miskweyaabiinymiwaan]
